Georgia statutes. TITLE 35 Law Enforcement Officers and Agencies
Article 5 Motor Carrier Compliance Division

35-2-100.
Creation; members designated as law enforcement officers.

There shall be created and established a division of the Department of Public Safety to be known as the Motor Carrier Compliance Division, and within the division shall be created a section to be known as the Motor Carrier Compliance Enforcement Section. Except as provided in Code Section 35-2-102, the members of the Motor Carrier Compliance Enforcement Section shall be known and designated as “law enforcement officers.”

History.

Code 1981, §

35-2-100

, enacted by Ga. L. 2005, p. 334, § 13A-2/HB 501; Ga. L. 2009, p. 122, § 1/HB 343; Ga. L. 2012, p. 580, § 7/HB 865.

35-2-101.
Jurisdiction; duties and powers; use of dogs to detect controlled substances.

The Motor Carrier Compliance Enforcement Section of the department shall have jurisdiction throughout this state with such duties and powers as are prescribed by law.

The primary duties of the Motor Carrier Compliance Enforcement Section shall be as follows:

Enforcement of laws and regulations relating to the size and the weights of motor vehicles, trailers, and loads as provided for in Article 2 of Chapter 6 of Title 32;

Enforcement of laws and regulations relating to licensing and fuel tax registration requirements and the reporting of violations thereof to the Department of Revenue;

Enforcement of safety standards for motor vehicles and motor vehicle components;

Enforcement of laws relating to hazardous materials carriers;

Enforcement of all state laws on the following properties owned or controlled by the Department of Transportation or the State Road and Tollway Authority: rest areas, truck-weighing stations or checkpoints, wayside parks, parking facilities, toll facilities, and any buildings and grounds for public equipment and personnel used for or engaged in administration, construction, or maintenance of the public roads or research pertaining thereto;

Enforcement of Code Section 16-10-24, relating to obstructing or hindering law enforcement officers;

Directing and controlling traffic on any public road which is part of the state highway system but only in areas where maintenance and construction activities are being performed and at scenes of accidents and emergencies until local police officers or Georgia State Patrol officers arrive and have the situation under control;

Enforcement of Code Sections 32-9-4 and 40-6-54, relating to designation of restricted travel lanes;

Enforcement of Code Section 16-11-43, relating to obstructing highways, streets, sidewalks, or other public passages, on any public road which is part of the state highway system;

Enforcement of Code Section 16-7-43, relating to littering public or private property or waters, on any public road which is part of the state highway system;

Enforcement of Code Section 16-7-24, relating to interference with government property, on any public road which is part of the state highway system; and

Enforcement of any state law when ordered to do so by the commissioner.

In performance of the duties specified in subsection (b) of this Code section, certified law enforcement officers employed by the department or designated by the commissioner shall:

Be authorized to carry firearms;

Exercise arrest powers;

Have the power to stop, enter upon, and inspect all motor vehicles using the public highways for purposes of determining whether such vehicles have complied with and are complying with laws, the administration or enforcement of which is the responsibility of the department;

Have the power to examine the facilities where motor vehicles are housed or maintained and the books and records of motor carriers for purposes of determining compliance with laws, the administration or enforcement of which is the responsibility of the department; and

Exercise the powers generally authorized for law enforcement officers in the performance of their duties or otherwise to the extent needed to protect any life or property when the circumstances demand action.

The commissioner shall authorize law enforcement officers of the Motor Carrier Compliance Enforcement Section to make use of dogs trained for the purpose of detection of drugs and controlled substances while such officers are engaged in the performance of their authorized duties. If such authorized use of such a dog indicates probable cause to indicate the presence of contraband, the officer or officers shall in those circumstances have the full authority of peace officers to enforce the provisions of Article 2 of Chapter 13 of Title 16, the “Georgia Controlled Substances Act,” and Article 3 of Chapter 13 of Title 16, the “Dangerous Drug Act”; provided, however, that the department must immediately notify the local law enforcement agency and district attorney of the jurisdiction where a seizure is made.

History.

Code 1981, §

35-2-101

, enacted by Ga. L. 2005, p. 334, § 13A-2/HB 501; Ga. L. 2012, p. 580, § 7/HB 865; Ga. L. 2016, p. 385, § 5/HB 806.

35-2-102.
Weight inspector positions; training; powers and responsibilities; presence of certified peace officer.

The commissioner is authorized to establish a position to be known as “weight inspector” within the Motor Carrier Compliance Enforcement Section of the Department of Public Safety. Weight inspectors shall be assigned to fixed scales facilities and shall not be authorized to operate outside such facilities. The number of such positions shall be determined by the commissioner within the limits set by available appropriations. Weight inspectors may be divided into such ranks as the commissioner deems appropriate.

The commissioner shall ensure that a weight inspector is properly trained regarding laws governing commercial motor vehicle weight, registration, size, and load, including, but not limited to, commercial motor vehicle provisions in Article 2 of Chapter 6 of Title 32 and safety standards for commercial motor vehicles and such motor vehicle components. The training required in the areas required by this subsection shall be equivalent to training provided to certified officers in the Motor Carrier Compliance Enforcement Section.

A weight inspector, at the fixed scales facility, shall be authorized to:

Enforce noncriminal provisions relating to commercial motor vehicle weight, registration, size, and load and assess a civil penalty for a violation of such provisions; and

Detain a commercial motor vehicle that:

Has a safety defect which is critical to the continued safe operation of the vehicle;

Is being operated in violation of any criminal law; or

Is being operated in violation of an out-of-service order as reported on the federal Safety and Fitness Electronic Records data base.

The detention authorized by this paragraph shall be for the purpose of contacting a certified member of the Motor Carrier Compliance Enforcement Section or Georgia State Patrol. A certified officer shall report to the scene of a detained vehicle and take any further action deemed appropriate including completing the inspection and investigation, making an arrest, or bringing criminal or civil charges.

At all times while a weight inspector is on duty, there shall be a supervisor over the weight inspector also on duty who shall be a certified peace officer.

History.

Code 1981, §

35-2-102

, enacted by Ga. L. 2009, p. 122, § 2/HB 343; Ga. L. 2012, p. 580, § 7/HB 865; Ga. L. 2021, p. 625, § 5/HB 479.

The 2021 amendment,

effective May 10, 2021, deleted the former first sentence of subsection (d), which read: “A weight inspector is not a peace officer and shall not be authorized to carry a firearm or exercise any power of arrest other than a citizen’s arrest in accordance with Code Sections 17-4-60 and 17-4-61.” See Editor’s notes for applicability.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2021, p. 625, § 8/HB 479, not codified by the General Assembly, provides, in part, that: “This Act shall not apply to rights and duties that matured, penalties that were incurred, or proceedings that were begun before the effective date of this Act.” This Act became effective May 10, 2021.

Law reviews.

For article, “HB 479: Repeal of Georgia’s Citizen’s Arrest Law,” see 38 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 25 (2021).